District of Columbia statutes.
47-2304

Monthly report of amount of fuel sold.

Each importer engaged in the District of Columbia in the sale or other disposition or use of motor vehicle fuel shall render to the Assessor of the District of Columbia, on or before the 25th day of each calendar month, on forms prescribed, prepared, and furnished by the said Assessor, a sworn report of the total number of gallons of motor vehicle fuel within the District of Columbia sold or otherwise disposed of by such importer or used by him in a motor vehicle operated for hire or for commercial purposes, and of the number of gallons of such fuel so sold or otherwise disposed of for exportation from and resale without the District of Columbia, during the preceding calendar month. Such report shall be sworn to by one of the principal officers in case of a domestic corporation, by the resident general agent, or attorney in fact, or by a chief accountant or officer in case of a foreign corporation, or by the managing agent or owner in case of a partnership or association.

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 4
Dec. 26, 1941, 55 Stat. 871, ch. 635, § 2
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2304.
1973 Ed., § 47-1904.

Prior Codifications

Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.

Editor's Notes